California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
The board may borrow money and incur indebtedness and issue bonds or other evidence of the indebtedness in the manner, and to the extent, deemed necessary by the board for further improvement and development of the harbor. The board also may do any other acts, and exercise any other powers, which may be necessary or convenient for the full exercise of the powers specifically granted by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5900.6.

When any improvement or development work done under the authority of the board is completed, the maintenance, management, and control of the work done, and of the harbor as so improved, shall pass to and be vested in the board. The board may employ and pay all necessary agents, servants, and employees to manage, maintain, and control the harbor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

5900.7.

If any portion of the harbor is situated within the boundaries of any incorporated city, the board of supervisors may enter into arrangements or contracts with the governing body of that city, upon such terms as may be agreed upon, for the purchase and maintenance of fireboats, patrol boats, sanitary and other equipment which the board deems necessary for the proper protection of the harbor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

5900.8.

The board shall exercise general supervision over the harbor and may adopt general rules and regulations for the government thereof, which in its judgment will best promote the interests thereof, if these rules and regulations do not conflict with the right of any city to exercise its police powers, or with the right of the city to license and regulate business enterprises within its corporate limits. If any business or enterprise is located adjacent to or affects the use and enjoyment of the waters of the harbor, the approval of the board of supervisors shall be necessary to the licensing and regulation thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 844.)
-------------------------------------------

5900.9.

The board may provide by ordinance for the regulation of anchorages, wharfages and dockage of vessels within the harbor and it may establish and collect fees and licenses therefor. The proceeds when collected shall be deposited to the credit of the harbor district fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 844.)
-------------------------------------------

5900.10.

Every person who violates the provisions of any ordinance enacted by the board of supervisors pursuant to this part, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 844.)
-------------------------------------------

5900.11.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

5901.

The governing body of a city within which a portion of the harbor is situated may establish by ordinance any regulations which are proper in the exercise of its police powers which regulations do not conflict with the provisions of this part, or with any lawful ordinance of the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 844.)
-------------------------------------------

5902.

The board of supervisors may by ordinance provide for the appointment of a harbor commission consisting of seven persons, and shall by ordinance define its powers and duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1356.)
-------------------------------------------

5903.

If the purposes for which the bonds were voted are being or shall be carried out by cooperation or agreement between the United States of America or any department, officer or agency thereof, and the district, the proceeds of the bonds may be turned over to the United States of America, or any department, officer or agency thereof, to be expended by it in the performance of the improvement or development work for which the bonds were voted.

If the improvement or development work for which the bonds of the district were voted is to be done jointly with the United States of America, or any department, officer or agency thereof, the portion of the cost to be borne by the district may be turned over to the United States of America, or any department, officer or agency thereof, to be expended by it in the performance of the improvement or development work, and all cooperative arrangements or agreements heretofore entered into are hereby validated, legalized and confirmed, and the payment and turning over to the United States of America or to any department, officer or agency thereof, heretofore or hereafter of the proceeds of any harbor district bonds for expenditure by the United States of America, or any department, officer or agency thereof, in the performance of the improvement or development work for which the bonds were voted is hereby validated, legalized and confirmed for all purposes and the performance of the work by or under the supervision of the United States of America, or any department, officer or agency thereof, is hereby validated, legalized and confirmed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

5904.

(a) The district may, in any year, levy assessments, reassessments, or special taxes and issue bonds to finance waterway construction projects and related operations and maintenance, or operations and maintenance projects independent of construction projects in accordance with, and pursuant to, the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Benefit Assessment Act of 1982 (Chapter 6.4 (commencing with Section 54703) of the Government Code), the Integrated Financing District Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 53175) of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), and the Marks-Roos Local Bond Pooling Act of 1985 (Article 4 (commencing with Section 6584) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(b) Sections 5116, 5117, 5118, 5119, 5190, 5191, 5192, 5193, 10104, and 10302 of the Streets and Highways Code shall not apply to assessment proceedings undertaken pursuant to this section. 

(c) Notwithstanding the related provisions of any assessment act which the district is authorized to use, any assessment diagram which any of those acts requires to be prepared prior to final approval of the assessment district may show only the exterior boundaries of the assessment district and the boundaries of any assessment zones or improvement areas within the district. The diagram may refer to the county assessor’s maps and records for a detailed description of each lot or parcel. 

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the district may levy and collect assessments and reassessments in the same manner as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 51320) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 of Division 15 of the Water Code, to pay any or all of the following: 

(1) For the operation and maintenance of projects, including maintenance of lands, easements, rights-of-way, dredge material disposal areas, and remediation. 

(2) For the satisfaction of liabilities arising from projects.

(3) To accumulate a fund which may be used to advance the cost of district projects, provided that the advances be repaid, with interest as determined by the commissioners, from assessments, reassessments, special taxes, or fees charged by the district pursuant to this section. 

(4) To acquire real property, easements, or rights-of-way for a navigation project or the maintenance of a navigation project. 

(5) To acquire real property within the district for the disposal of dredged material. 

(e) For purposes of this section, functions designated by Article 3 (commencing with Section 51320) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 of Division 15 of the Water Code to be performed by the board of supervisors, the board of trustees, or valuation commissioners shall be performed by the district’s board. 

(f) For purposes of this section, the board may order the creation of a separate assessment roll to pay the allowable expenses of any single project or any group or system of projects. 

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all assessments, reassessments, and taxes levied by the district may be collected together with, and not separately from, taxes for county purposes. Any county in which the district is located may collect, at the request of the district, all assessments, reassessments, and special taxes levied by the district and shall cause those revenues to be deposited into the county treasury to the credit of the district. Each county may deduct its reasonable collection and administrative costs. 

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any assessment or reassessment levied pursuant to this section may be apportioned on the basis of land use category, tonnage shipped on the waterway, size and type of vessel using the waterway, front footage, acreage, capital improvements, or other reasonable basis, separately or in combination, as determined by the district commissioners. 

(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Division 4 (commencing with Section 2800) of the Streets and Highways Code shall not apply to any assessment levied by the district. 

(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no bond issued pursuant to this section shall be used to fund the routine maintenance dredging of channels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 978, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Claims [5905. - 5905.]

5905.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Improvement of Other Harbor or Harbors Within the District [5910. - 5915.]

5910.

Any harbor improvement district organized and existing pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5800) of Division 8 may improve, develop, protect, and maintain any or all harbors within its boundaries in accordance with the procedure, and in the manner provided, in this chapter and in the Public Contract Code, except that nothing in this chapter or in the Public Contract Code affects state-owned tidelands and submerged lands or the jurisdiction of the State Lands Commission over tidelands and submerged lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

5911.

The board of supervisors of any county in which the district is situated may direct the harbor commission, appointed pursuant to Section 5902 of this part, to prepare surveys for the improvement, development or protection of any harbor or harbors within the district, prepare plans therefor and estimates of cost thereof, and to report to the board of supervisors thereon, with its recommendations covering the necessity, advantages and benefits to be derived by the improvement, development or protection of such harbor or harbors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 565.)
-------------------------------------------

5912.

Upon receiving the report and recommendation of the harbor commission, the board shall fix a date for hearing on the report to consider and determine the feasibility of the project or projects submitted. The hearing shall be held not more than thirty (30) days nor less than twenty (20) days after the filing of the report, and the board shall cause notice of the fact that the report has been filed and of the date fixed for the hearing to be published by at least two (2) publications in a newspaper published within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 565.)
-------------------------------------------

5913.

The hearing, investigation, determination and findings of the board of supervisors shall be conducted and made in accordance with the provisions of Sections 5835 to 5841, inclusive, of this part, which sections are incorporated herein to the extent that they are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 565.)
-------------------------------------------

5914.

Upon final hearing, if the board finds that the harbor or harbors can be improved, developed and protected as generally described in the report and recommendation of the harbor commission at a cost not disproportionate to the benefits to be derived from the proposed project, the board may order the development, improvement or protection of the harbor or harbors in accordance with its findings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 565.)
-------------------------------------------

5915.

For the purpose of financing the improvement, development, protection and maintenance of such additional harbor or harbors, the board may issue bonds, borrow money, incur indebtedness and levy taxes, all in the same manner and to the same extent as in the improvement, development, protection and maintenance of the harbor for which the district was originally formed, and shall in all other respects have the same powers and duties with respect to the improvement, development, protection and maintenance of such additional harbor or harbors as it has with respect to the original harbor for which the district was formed.

The board may issue no bonds hereunder unless the incurring of the bonded indebtedness for the improvement, development, protection and maintenance of such additional harbor or harbors shall first have been approved at an election held in the manner provided in Article 3, Chapter 1, Part 2 of Division 8 of this code, and pursuant to the provisions of said article with reference to the incurring of bonded indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 565.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Acquisition, Improvement or Maintenance of Lands for Public Beaches [5940. - 5945.]

5940.

Any harbor improvement district organized and existing pursuant to this part may purchase, lease or obtain by gift lands for public beaches located within the boundaries of the district and may hold, improve or maintain such lands. Any and all such acquisition, improvement or maintenance as is authorized herein shall be accomplished and carried out in accordance with the procedure and in the manner hereinafter provided in this chapter, except that nothing in this chapter shall affect state-owned tidelands and submerged lands or the jurisdiction of the State Lands Commission over tidelands and submerged lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 441.)
-------------------------------------------

5941.

The board of supervisors of any county in which a district is situated may direct the harbor commission, appointed pursuant to Section 5902, to prepare surveys for the acquisition, improvement or maintenance of such lands as is herein authorized, prepare plans therefor and estimates of cost thereof, and to report to the board of supervisors thereon, with its recommendations covering the necessity, advantages and benefits to be derived by the acquisition, improvement or maintenance of such lands as public beaches.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 441.)
-------------------------------------------

5942.

Upon receiving the report and recommendation of the harbor commission, the board shall fix a date for hearing on the report to consider and determine the feasibility of the project or projects submitted. The hearing shall be held not more than 30 days nor less than 20 days after the filing of the report, and the board shall cause notice of the fact that the report has been filed and of the date fixed for the hearing to be published by at least two publications in a newspaper published within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 441.)
-------------------------------------------

5943.

The hearing, investigation, determination and findings of the board of supervisors shall be conducted and made in accordance with the provisions of Sections 5835 to 5841, inclusive, of the Harbors and Navigations Code which sections are incorporated herein to the extent that they are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 441.)
-------------------------------------------

5944.

Upon final hearing, if the board finds that the lands considered in the commission’s report can be acquired, improved or maintained as generally described in the report and recommendation of the harbor commission at a cost not disproportionate to the benefits to be derived from the proposed project, the board may order the acquisition, improvement or maintenance of the lands considered in the commission’s report in accordance with the board’s findings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 441.)
-------------------------------------------

5945.

For the purpose of financing the acquisition, improvement or maintenance of such lands as is authorized herein, the board may issue bonds, borrow money, incur indebtedness and levy taxes, all in the same manner and to the same extent as in the improvement, development, protection or maintenance of the harbor for which the district was originally formed, and shall in all other respects have the same general powers and duties with respect to the acquisition, improvement or maintenance of such lands as it has with respect to the original harbor for which the district was formed.

The board may issue no bonds hereunder unless the incurring of the bonded indebtedness for the acquisition, improvement or maintenance of such lands shall first have been approved at an election held in the manner provided in Article 3, (commencing with Section 5859) Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 8 of this code, and pursuant to the provisions of that article with reference to the incurring of bonded indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 441.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Inland Parks and Recreation Areas [5950. - 5956.]

5950.

The board of supervisors may manage the business of the district and promote the commercial interest of the harbor by advertisement of its advantages and by the solicitation of business within or without the district, in other states, or in foreign countries, through employees or agencies as are expedient, and it may organize, promote, conduct, and advertise programs of community recreation and the advantages of the district’s park and recreational facilities.

Nothing in this section authorizes revenues derived from tide and submerged lands granted in trust by the state to a district, or from lands acquired with those trust revenues, to be used by the district for any purpose other than for proper trust purposes on the granted lands, or for the acquisition, improvement, and maintenance of property adjacent to the granted lands when the property is necessary to further the purposes of the trust grant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5950.1.

The term “inland parks and recreation areas,” as used in this chapter, includes, but is not limited to, open-space land, as defined by subdivision (h) of Section 65560 of the Government Code, except that such term shall not include open-space land, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 65560.

The provisions of Section 5900.4 shall not apply to the acquisition of forest lands, rangeland, or agricultural lands when the acquisition is for the purpose of establishing hiking, bicycling, or equestrian trails or where the lands are being acquired for their scenic or aesthetic values.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 434, Sec. 8.   (SB 732)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5950.5.

The board of supervisors of any harbor improvement district organized and existing pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5800) may authorize the district to acquire, develop, operate, and maintain inland parks and recreation areas pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5950 (as added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195) by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

5951.

If the district is authorized to acquire, develop, operate, and maintain inland parks and recreation areas, the board of supervisors shall, by resolution, adopt a new name for the district which will reflect its new duties and responsibilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1356.)
-------------------------------------------

5952.

If the district is authorized to acquire, develop, operate, and maintain inland parks and recreation areas, at least 75 percent of its annual expenditures shall be devoted to that purpose until such time as the total expenditure of district and county funds for land, structures, and improvements which is used for inland park and recreation purposes shall have equaled the total expenditure of district and county funds for land, structures, and improvements which is used for beach and harbor purposes. Thereafter, the district shall devote at least 50 percent of its annual expenditures averaged over each five-year period for inland park and recreation purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1356.)
-------------------------------------------

5953.

For the purpose of determining the annual expenditures required by Section 5952, only such expenditures for land, structures, and improvements as are raised by local taxation within the district shall be included and the district shall be both charged and credited with the expenditures for land, structures, and improvements made by the county in which the district is located, both for beach and harbor purposes and for inland park and recreational purposes. Within 90 days after the effective date of this section, the auditor-controller of the county in which the district is located shall report to the board of supervisors the moneys raised by local taxation for land, structures, and improvements by the district and by the county for beach and harbor purposes and inland park and recreational purposes. The future annual expenditures, at the ratio set forth in Section 5952, shall be for those expenditures paid from funds raised by the levy of taxes by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1356.)
-------------------------------------------

5954.

In acquiring, developing, operating, or maintaining inland parks and recreaton areas, the district shall follow and comply with, as nearly as possible, the procedures provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 5940) of this part in regard to the acquisition, improvement, or maintenance of lands for public beaches.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1356.)
-------------------------------------------

5955.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 5940 to 5954, inclusive, the district may acquire, develop, operate, or maintain public beaches or inland parks and recreation areas without holding the hearings and making the findings required by such provisions if there is compliance with Section 21151 of the Public Resources Code and Section 65402 of the Government Code; provided, however, that the board of supervisors shall hold at least one public hearing prior to the approval of any such project. Harbor improvement district funds may be expended prior to the public hearing for the purpose of obtaining compliance with Section 21151 of the Public Resources Code and Section 65402 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 125.)
-------------------------------------------

5956.

The district may purchase, collect, trade, exchange, or otherwise acquire exhibition or study material necessary or proper for the use of museums or exhibits maintained by the district, and may sell, lend, or exchange the material, according to the established custom of museums.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 328, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. HARBOR DISTRICTS [6000. - 6110.]



  General Provisions

6000.

“Harbor,” as used in this part, includes any bay, harbor, inlet, river, channel, slough, or arm of the sea, in which the tides of the Pacific Ocean ebb and flow or in which tides are affected by the Pacific Ocean.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6001.

“Board,” as used in this part, means the commission or board having the management or control of the improvements, development, protection and maintenance of any harbor district established or formed pursuant to this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.

“District,” as used in this part, refers to a district formed pursuant to this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1. Formation [6010. - 6045.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petition [6010. - 6014.]

6010.

A county or portion of a county or city or portion of a city or more than one city with or without a portion of the unincorporated territory of a county, the exterior boundary of which includes a harbor, may be formed into a harbor district for the improvement or development of the harbor upon proceedings being taken pursuant to this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6011.

Whenever fifty or more persons in any area which may be formed into a district pursuant to this part, desire the formation of a district for the improvement or development of a harbor, they may sign and present to the board of supervisors of the county in which the harbor is situated, a petition in writing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6012.

The petition shall contain:

(a) The name of the proposed district.

(b) The official name or names by which the harbor is commonly known.

(c) The exterior boundaries of the proposed district which shall include the whole or a portion of the harbor proposed to be improved or developed and which may include any of the following alternatives:

(1) All or a portion of a county.

(2) All or a portion of a city.

(3) All of one or more cities.

(4) All of one or more cities and unincorporated territory situated in any county.

(d) A general description of the improvement and development work proposed to be done in the harbor, which work may include the dredging of channels, shipways, berths, anchorage places and turning basins, the construction of jetties, breakwaters, bulkheads, seawalls, wharves, ferry slips, warehouses, roads and spur tracks or belt line railways, together with any other work necessary for the development and improvement of the harbor.

(e) A request that the territory included within such boundaries be formed into a district for the improvement and development of the harbor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6013.

Each signer of the petition shall be a registered voter, resident and freeholder within the proposed district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6014.

The petition shall be published for a least two weeks preceding the hearing thereon in a newspaper of general circulation printed in the proposed district, if there is such a newspaper so printed. If not, publication shall be so made in a newspaper published in the county.

With the petition there shall be published a notice signed by not exceeding three of the petitioners, setting forth the day, hour and place at which the petition will be presented to the board of supervisors of the county for hearing, which date shall not be less than twenty nor more than forty days from the first publication. All persons interested may appear at that time and place before the board of supervisors and be heard.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hearing [6020. - 6026.]

6020.

At the time and place specified in the notice, the board of supervisors shall consider the petition and may continue the hearing from time to time, not exceeding a period of 90 days.

At the hearing by the board of supervisors a certificate issued by the assessor of the county and filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors in the proceedings stating that the name of any signer of the petition appears upon the last equalized assessment roll of the county for land assessed to that signer and located within the boundaries of the proposed district, is prima facie evidence that the signer is a freeholder within the proposed district.

A certificate signed by the county elections official that the name of any signer of the petition is a registered and uncanceled voter of the county, residing within the boundaries of the proposed district, is prima facie evidence that the signer is a registered voter within the boundaries of the proposed district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6021.

At the hearing, the board of supervisors may change the exterior boundaries of the proposed district, as set forth in the petition, by excluding lands which would not be benefited by the improvement or development of the harbor.

The board of supervisors may also change the exterior boundaries of the proposed district by adding to the district and including therein other contiguous lands which will be benefited by the improvement or development of the harbor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6022.

Land may not be added to or included in the proposed district until notice is served upon the owner of the lands affected.

The notice may be served personally upon the owner or be published for the same period of time in the same newspaper as the original petition and notice of hearing.

The notice shall state the day, hour and place at which any objections of the owner will be heard and shall generally describe the lands affected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6023.

The board of supervisors shall investigate and determine whether or not the improvement and development work generally described in the petition is feasible and whether, when completed, it will result in the improvement and development of the harbor and become a benefit to the property within the district.

If it appears, and the board of supervisors finds, that it is necessary in order to make sufficient and adequate investigation upon which to determine such questions to continue the hearing beyond ninety days, the board of supervisors may do so, but the hearing shall be completed within six months from the date of the presentation of the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6024.

Upon the completion of the hearing, the board of supervisors shall have a finding of facts entered upon the minutes if it appears that:

(a) The petition and notice of hearing have been duly published.

(b) The petition is signed by a sufficient number of persons who possess the required qualifications.

(c) A harbor exists within the proposed district.

(d) The harbor can be improved and developed as generally described in the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6025.

The findings of fact required to be made by the board of supervisors shall set forth:

(a) The name of the proposed district as set forth in the petition.

(b) The official name or name by which the harbor is commonly known.

(c) A description of the exterior boundaries of the territory to be included within the proposed district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6026.

The findings are conclusive evidence of the existence of every fact so found by the board of supervisors and of the due signing and publication of the petition and of the publication or personal service of all notices and vest the board of supervisors with authority to proceed pursuant to this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Election for Formation and for Harbor Commissioners [6030. - 6045.]

6030.

The board of supervisors shall have entered in its minutes an order finally determining and establishing the exterior boundaries of the proposed district, and it shall pass a resolution calling an election within the district for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters the proposition of the formation of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6031.

The board of supervisors, by resolution, shall fix the date of the election, which shall not be less than 130 days from the date of its passage and it shall divide the proposed district into one or more voting precincts and generally describe or otherwise designate the boundaries of each precinct and designate a place within each precinct at which the polls will be opened for the purpose of the election on the day of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6032.

The board of supervisors for the first election in the proposed district and the board at any subsequent election in the district, shall appoint a board of election for each precinct, consisting of at least one inspector, one judge and one clerk. Each member of the board of election shall be a registered elector of and reside within the precinct for which he is appointed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 777.)
-------------------------------------------

6033.

The resolution shall also prescribe the manner of voting for or against the formation of the district, and in all particulars not recited in the resolution or otherwise provided for in this part, the election shall be held in accordance with the general election laws, so far as they are applicable. It is not necessary to mail or send out sample ballots or precinct polling cards.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6034.

The resolution shall invite the qualified voters residing in the district to vote upon the propositions of its formation and the election of a board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6035.

The ballot to be used at the election shall be substantially in the following form: 

(Name) Harbor District Official Ballot

Instructions to voters: to vote in favor of the formation of the harbor district, mark in the voting area at the right of the words “For the harbor district.” To vote against the formation of the harbor district mark in the voting area at the right of the words “Against the harbor district.” To vote for a candidate for harbor commissioner mark after the name of the candidate; but no more persons shall be voted for than there are offices of harbor commissioner to be filled at this election.

All erasures and distinguishing
 marks are forbidden and make the ballot void. If you wrongfully stamp, tear, or deface this ballot, return it to the inspector of elections and obtain another.

“For the harbor district.”

“Against the harbor district.”

“For harbor commissioners.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 110.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6036.

The official ballot at the first election in the proposed district shall provide voting squares after the words “For the harbor district” and after the words “Against the harbor district” and shall also have printed thereon the names of all candidates for harbor commissioner, together with five blank spaces for the purpose of permitting an elector to write in the name of a candidate, with voting squares after the name of each candidate and the five blank spaces.

All official ballots used at any subsequent election in the district shall conform, as near as practicable, to the above ballot, excepting that all reference to voting for or against the formation of the district shall be eliminated; and any question or proposition authorized to be submitted to the voters of the district may be placed on the ballot in addition to the names of any candidate or candidates for harbor commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 997.)
-------------------------------------------

6037.

The resolution calling the first election and the resolution of the board calling any subsequent election shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper published, printed and circulated in the district.

The passage and publication of the resolution of the board of supervisors calling the first election and the passage and publication of the resolution of the board calling any subsequent election and publication, as provided for in this part, constitute the notice of election and other or additional notice need not be given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 540.)
-------------------------------------------

6037.1.

Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the legislative body which has called the election shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. Such written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district, and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the legislative body calling the district formation election.

The executive officer, within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation. 

The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed. 

The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

6037.2.

The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of such voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.
